Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 25.1 Gambling Referenda

17-25.1-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 332, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 174, § 3, effective June 27, 2006; P.L. 2006, ch. 292, § 3, effective July 3, 2006.

17-25.1-1.1.
Gambling referenda — Ballot question advocates.

Any “ballot question advocate”, as defined in chapter 25.2 of title 17, advocating the passage or defeat of any gambling question shall, in addition to complying with and being subject to the provisions of chapter 25.2 of title 17, include in its reports filed under said chapter the following: (i) the name, address and, if applicable, the place of employment of every person making a contribution or contributions that in the aggregate exceed one thousand eight hundred dollars ($1,800) per election cycle to such ballot question advocate; and (ii) whether or not such contributor has any direct or indirect affiliation with any entity or person that operates or owns any type or kind of gambling facility or entity in any jurisdiction and, if so, the name of such facility or entity. “Gambling question” means any referendum that relates to a proposal to institute a casino within the state or to otherwise expand gambling in any form.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 174, § 4; P.L. 2006, ch. 292, § 4.

17-25.1-2 — 17-25.1-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 332, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 594, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 2006, ch. 174, § 3, effective June 27, 2006; P.L. 2006, ch. 292, § 3, effective July 3, 2006.